test/src/morphology/N-variiksh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - varīkš: # Noun 209 'eng /est vares/fin' - full paradigm
     varīkš+N+Sg+Nom: varīkš
     varīkš+N+Sg+Gen: varīkš
     varīkš+N+Sg+Par: varīkšt
     varīkš+N+Sg+Dat: varīkšõn
     varīkš+N+Sg+Ins: varīkšõks
     varīkš+N+Sg+Ill: varīkšõ
     varīkš+N+Sg+Ela: varīkšõst
     varīkš+N+Pl+Nom: varīkšt
     varīkš+N+Pl+Gen: varīkšt
     varīkš+N+Pl+Par: varīkši
     varīkš+N+Pl+Dat: varīkštõn
     varīkš+N+Pl+Ins: varīkštõks
     varīkš+N+Pl+Ill: varīkšiz
     varīkš+N+Pl+Ela: varīkšist
